Utah statutes.
48-3a-203.   Signing of records to be delivered for filing to division.

(1)  A record delivered to the division for filing pursuant to this chapter must be signed as follows:

(a)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsections (1)(b) and (c), a record signed on behalf of a limited liability company must be signed by a person authorized by the limited liability company.

(b)  A limited liability company's initial certificate of organization must be signed by at least one person acting as an organizer.

(c)  A record delivered on behalf of a dissolved limited liability company that has no member must be signed by the person winding up the limited liability company's activities and affairs under Subsection 48-3a-703(3) or a person appointed under Subsection 48-3a-703(4) to wind up the activities and affairs.

(d)  A statement of denial by a person under Section 48-3a-303 must be signed by that person.

(e)  Any other record delivered on behalf of a person to the division for filing must be signed by that person.

(2)  Any record filed under this chapter may be signed by an agent.  Whenever this chapter requires a particular individual to sign a record and the individual is deceased or incompetent, the record may be signed by a legal representative of the individual.

(3)  A person that signs a record as an agent or legal representative thereby affirms as a fact that the person is authorized to sign the record.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

